Washington statutes.
RCW 11.106.060

Account filed—Objections—Appointment of guardians ad litem—Representatives.

Upon or before the return date any beneficiary of the trust may file the beneficiary's written objections or exceptions to the account filed or to any action of the trustee or trustees set forth in the account. The court shall appoint guardians ad litem as provided in RCW 11.96A.160 and the court may allow representatives to be appointed under RCW 11.96A.120 or 11.96A.250 to represent the persons listed in those sections.

[ 1999 c 42 s 629; 1985 c 30 s 100. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 133; 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 31; 1955 c 33 s 30.30.060; prior: 1951 c 226 s 6. Formerly RCW 30.30.060.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 c 42: See RCW 11.96A.902.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.

Purpose—Intent—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 80: See notes following RCW 4.16.190.